Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 2
VITAL STATISTICS

Sec.

§ 39-201 — 39-210. Jurisdiction of department of public welfare — Local registration districts — Local registrars — Dead bodies — Stillborn children — Death certificates — Burial permits — Disinterment. [Repealed.]

§ 39-211. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-212. Duties of sexton. [Repealed.]

§ 39-213. Transportation of bodies of persons dying of certain diseases

Diseases. [Repealed.]

§ 39-214 — 39-217. Registration of births — Duties of physicians and midwives — Certificates of birth — Given names. [Repealed.]

§ 39-218. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-219 — 39-221. Affidavit of legitimation — Correction of certificates of birth, death and marriage. [Repealed.]

§ 39-222 — 39-234. Registration of physicians, midwives, and undertakers — Statistical records and forms — Compensation of local registrars — Fees — Penalties — County recorder — Fees — Failure to perform duties — Punishment. [Repealed.]

§ 39-235 — 39-239. [Reserved.]

VITAL STATISTICS ACT

§ 39-240. Short title — Legislative findings.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Vital Statistics Act.”

The legislature finds:

As early as 1632, government officials began tracking vital statistics, specifically births, deaths, and marriages;

Today, state and local vital records offices record over eleven million (11,000,000) vital events annually in the United States;

Material facts included in vital records include the date of birth, the individual’s sex, the location of birth, the parents’ identities, and the date of death;

The purpose of documenting factual information on vital records is to help the government fulfill one of its most basic duties: protecting the health and safety of its citizens;

Numerous courts have recognized that the purpose of vital records is to maintain an accurate database of factual information regarding births, deaths, and other vital events in a given jurisdiction. See
Sea v. U.S. Citizenship & Immigration Servs.
, 2015 WL 5092509, at *4 (D. Minn. Aug. 28, 2015) (“The public does have an interest in having accurate records on vital Statistics. . .)”;

Ampadu v. U.S. Citizenship & Immigration Servs., Dist. Dir.

, 944 F. Supp. 2d 648, 655 (C.D. Ill. 2013) (acknowledging ”the public’s interest in having accurate records on vital statistics“);

Boiko v. Holder

, 2013 WL 709047, at *2 (D. Colo. Feb. 26, 2013) (”[T]he government, and the public at large, would appear to benefit from having the most accurate vital statistics records possible.“);

J.R. v. Utah

, 261 F. Supp. 2d 1268, 1294 (D. Utah 2002) (”The State also has a significant interest in the accuracy of the records it keeps, particularly vital records like birth certificates.“);

According to the national research council committee on national statistics, factual information contained in vital records is used to help diagnose and solve problems that impact national health, including tracking and diagnosing disparities in mortality rates based on age and sex, identifying factors that account for the significant differences in life expectancy between males and females, measuring and seeking solutions to socioeconomic inequalities in health based on sex and age, and studying infant death rates based on sex, location, birth weight, and other information collected from vital records;

Factual information from vital records is also necessary for national security. It is used to identify potential disease epidemics, such as the zika virus, that may disproportionately impact one sex over the other; expose covert bioterrorist attacks, such as determining whether a sudden increase in certain symptoms in a population is due to random chance or should be further investigated; and identify criminals and terrorists, where vital records can be used to uncover fraudulently obtained driver’s licenses or passports; and
(h) Allowing individuals to alter their vital records, including birth certificates, based upon subjective feelings or experiences undermines the government’s interest in having accurate vital records.

§ 39-241. Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter and this chapter only, the following terms shall be construed to have the meanings hereinafter set forth:

“Adoptive parent” means an adult who has become a parent of a child through the legal process of adoption.

“Advanced practice registered nurse” means a registered nurse licensed in this state who has gained additional specialized knowledge, skills and experience as defined in section 54-1402, Idaho Code, and includes the following four (4) roles: certified nurse midwife; clinical nurse specialist; certified nurse practitioner; and certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined by the applicable board of nursing rule.

“Board” means the Idaho state board of health and welfare.

“Certified copy” means the reproduction of an original vital record by typewritten, photographic or electronic means. Such reproductions, when certified by the state registrar, shall be used as the original.

“Consent” means a verified written statement which has been notarized.

“Dead body” means a lifeless human body or such parts of the human body or the bones thereof from the state of which it reasonably may be concluded that death occurred.

“Director” means the director of the department of health and welfare.

“Fetal death” means death prior to the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy; the death is indicated by the fact that after such expulsion or extraction, the fetus does not breathe or show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles.

“Induced termination of pregnancy (induced abortion)” means the purposeful interruption of pregnancy with an intention other than to produce a live-born infant or to remove a dead fetus and which does not result in a live birth.

“Spontaneous fetal death” means the expulsion or extraction of a product of human conception resulting in other than a live birth and which is not an induced termination of pregnancy.

“Identifying information” includes the following information:

The name of the qualified adoptee before placement in adoption;

The name and address of each qualified birthparent as it appears in birth records;

The current name, address and telephone number of the qualified adult adoptee; and

The current name, address and telephone number of each qualified birthparent.

“Live birth” means the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, which, after such expulsion or extraction, breathes, or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not the umbilical cord has been cut or the placenta is attached. Heartbeats are to be distinguished from transient cardiac contractions; respirations are to be distinguished from fleeting respiratory efforts or gasps.

“Person in charge of interment” means any person who places or causes to be placed a stillborn fetus or dead body or the ashes of the same, after cremation, in a grave, vault, urn, or other receptacle, or otherwise disposes thereof.
(12) “Physician” means a person legally authorized to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine in this state as defined in section 54-1803, Idaho Code.

“Physician” means a person legally authorized to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine in this state as defined in section 54-1803, Idaho Code.

“Physician assistant” means any person who is a graduate of an acceptable training program and who is otherwise qualified to render patient services as defined in section 54-1803, Idaho Code.

“Qualified adult adoptee” means an adopted person eighteen (18) years of age or older who was born in Idaho.

“Qualified adult birth sibling” means a genetic, biological, or natural brother or sister or half-brother or half-sister, eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Qualified birthparent” means a genetic, biological, or natural parent whose rights were voluntarily or involuntarily terminated by a court or otherwise. “Birthparent” includes a man who is the parent of a child prior to the termination of parental rights.

“Record” means the original certificate of an event and any replacement thereof filed for record by virtue of authority contained in this chapter, as well as instruments of any nature provided by this chapter as a means of effecting replacement of certificates.

“Registrar” means the state registrar of vital statistics or a designated representative.

“Relative” includes only an individual’s spouse, birthparent, adoptive parent, sibling, or child who is eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Stillbirth” means a spontaneous fetal death of twenty (20) completed weeks gestation or more, based on a clinical estimate of gestation, or a weight of three hundred fifty (350) grams (twelve and thirty-five hundredths (12.35) ounces) or more.

“Vital statistics” includes the registration, preparation, transcription, collection, compilation and preservation of data pertaining to births, adoptions, legitimations, deaths, stillbirths, induced terminations of pregnancy, marital status and data incidental thereto.

“Voluntary adoption registry” or “registry” means a place where eligible persons, as described in section 39-259A, Idaho Code, may indicate their willingness to have their identity and whereabouts disclosed to each other under conditions specified in section 39-259A, Idaho Code.

(f) In respect to form and nature of contents, such a new birth certificate shall be identical with a birth certificate issued to natural parents for the birth of a child, except that the adoptive parents shall be shown as parents and the adopted person shall have the name assigned by the decree of adoption as shown on the report of adoption. In a case where a single person adopts another person, any new birth certificate may designate the adopting parent as adoptive.

§ 39-242. Duties of director.

The director shall:

Establish a vital statistics unit with suitable offices properly equipped for the preservation of its official records;

Install statewide system of vital statistics;

Supervise and require the enforcement of this chapter and the regulations of the board made pursuant thereto. The board is authorized to adopt, amend and repeal regulations for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 39-243. State registrar of vital statistics.

The director shall designate and appoint a state registrar of vital statistics who shall be qualified in accordance with the standards prescribed by law or regulations of the board. Compensation shall be fixed in the same manner as the salary of other employees of the department.

§ 39-244. Duties of state registrar.

The state registrar, under the direction of the director, shall:

Have charge of the vital statistics unit;

Be official custodian of all its files and records;

Perform the duties prescribed by law and the regulations of the board;

Have supervisory power over local vital statistics registration and local registration officers;

Enforce this chapter and regulations of the board; and

Have the authority to delegate portions of the vital records responsibility to the duly appointed local registrar(s).

§ 39-245. Certificate forms.

The form of certificates used under the provisions of this chapter shall be prescribed by the director and shall include as a minimum the items required by the respective standard certificates as recommended by the national agency in charge of vital statistics; provided, however, that the provisions of section 39-1005, Idaho Code, shall be given effect on a certificate to which that section is applicable.

§ 39-245A. Certificates of birth — Material facts included — Amendments.

The legislature finds that:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that:

There is a compelling interest in maintaining accurate, quantitative, biology-based material facts on Idaho certificates of birth that provide material facts fundamental to the performance of government functions that secure the public health and safety, including but not limited to identifying public health trends, assessing risks, conducting criminal investigations, and helping individuals determine their biological lineage, citizenship, or susceptibility to genetic disorders;

The equal protection clause of the fourteenth amendment to the United States constitution prohibits purposeful discrimination, not facially neutral laws of general applicability, such as a biology-based definition of sex that has been consistently applied since our nation’s founding;

Decades of court opinion have upheld the argument that biological distinctions between male and female are a matter of scientific fact, and biological sex is an objectively defined category that has obvious, immutable, and distinguishable characteristics;

Identification of biological sex on a birth certificate impacts the health and safety of all individuals. For example, the society for evidence based gender medicine has declared that the conflation of sex and gender in health care is alarming, subjects hundreds of thousands of individuals to the risk of unintended medical harm, and will greatly impede medical research;

Vital statistics are defined in section 39-241(21), Idaho Code, as data, being the plural of datum, which is a known fact;

Idaho certificates of birth are of an evidentiary character and prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein, according to section 39-274, Idaho Code;

Age and sex, unlike the names of natural parents whose rights have been terminated, are legally applicable facts fundamental to the performance of public and private policies and contracts;

The failure to maintain accurate, quantitative vital statistics and legal definitions upon which the government and others may with confidence rely constitutes a breach of the public trust; and

The government has a compelling interest in maintaining the public trust and confidence and a duty to fulfill, to the best of its ability, those functions that rely on accurate vital statistics.

Based on the findings in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the legislature directs that an Idaho certificate of birth shall document specific quantitative, material facts at the time of birth, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Is signed by:

Is signed by the physician or other person in attendance who provided the medical information and certified to the facts of birth; and

Declares that the information contained on the certificate of birth incorrectly represents a material fact at the time of birth.

Any certificate of birth issued under the provisions of this chapter shall include the following quantitative statistics and material facts specific to that birth: time of birth, date of birth, sex, birth weight, birth length, and place of birth.

For purposes of this chapter, “sex” means the immutable biological and physiological characteristics, specifically the chromosomes and internal and external reproductive anatomy, genetically determined at conception and generally recognizable at birth, that define an individual as male or female.

The quantitative statistics and material facts identified in subsection (2) of this section may be amended within one (1) year of the filing of the certificate by submitting to the registrar a notarized affidavit of correction that:
(a) Is on a form prescribed by the registrar;

The parents identified on the certificate of birth; or

The child’s legal guardian;

In those instances in which an individual suffers from a physiological disorder of sexual development and the individual’s biological sex cannot be recognized at birth as male or female based upon externally observable reproductive anatomy, the physician shall make a presumptive determination of the individual’s sex, which may thereafter be amended based on the appropriate combination of genetic analysis and evaluation of the individual’s naturally occurring internal and external reproductive anatomy as provided in section (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a hospital may correct a birth certificate for a clerical or data entry error at any time by submitting a notarized affidavit on a form specified by the registrar with any appropriate supporting documentation.

After one (1) year, the quantitative statistics and material facts identified in subsection (2) of this section may be challenged in court only on the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact, with the burden of proof upon the party challenging the acknowledgment.

§ 39-246. Local registration districts.

The director shall establish registration districts and change the boundaries of the same from time to time which shall conform to political subdivisions, or combinations or parts thereof.

§ 39-247. Local registration officers.

The state registrar shall appoint local registration officers for such registration districts as are established by the director. Such local registration officers shall meet the qualifications fixed by the board, and shall perform such duties as are required by the chapter and the regulations of the board.

§ 39-248. Other employees.

The director shall provide such assistants as the vital statistics unit may require and determine the compensation and duties of persons thus employed.

§ 39-249. Transmittal of certificates and local records.

Local registration officers shall transmit all certificates filed with them to the state registrar in accordance with the regulations of the board. Complete and accurate copies of all certificates shall be made by the local registrar for local records purposes.

§ 39-250. Completion and correction of certificates — Procedure — Other alterations prohibited.

A certificate of any event shall be completed, corrected, amended or otherwise altered after being filed with the vital statistics unit only in accordance with this chapter and rules promulgated by the board.

A certificate that is amended under the provisions of this section shall be marked “amended,” except as otherwise provided in this section. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment shall be filed with or made a part of the record. The department shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which additions or minor corrections may be made to certificates or records within one (1) year after the date of the event without the certificate being marked “amended.”

Upon receipt of a notarized voluntary acknowledgment of paternity, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show such paternity if paternity is not already shown on the certificate of birth, and change the child’s surname to that of the father, if both parents so request. Such certificate shall not be marked “amended.”

Upon receipt of both a notarized affidavit of nonpaternity signed by the husband attesting that he is not the father, and a notarized acknowledgment of paternity signed by the mother and the alleged father attesting that the alleged father is the father, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show such paternity, and change the child’s name, if so requested by the mother and the alleged father. Such certificate shall not be marked “amended.”

Upon receipt of a certified copy of an order of a court of competent jurisdiction changing the name of a person born in this state and upon request of such person or the parent(s), guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar shall amend the certificate of birth to show the new name.

When an applicant does not submit the minimum documentation required in the rules for amending a vital record in a manner otherwise permitted by rule, or when the state registrar has reasonable cause to question the validity or adequacy of the applicant’s sworn statements or the documentary evidence, and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar shall not amend the vital record and shall advise the applicant of the reason for this action and shall further advise the applicant of the right to petition a court of competent jurisdiction for an order establishing the facts necessary to make the requested amendment.

If an acknowledgment of paternity or affidavit of nonpaternity is rescinded pursuant to section 7-1106, Idaho Code, and the certificate of birth had been prepared or amended in accordance with the acknowledgment, the state registrar shall not release any copies of the certificate of birth except as required for a legal proceeding until a court order determining paternity has been provided to the state registrar. If the mother was married at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth, the court shall also determine if the husband is the father of the child.

§ 39-251. Compensation of local registrars.

Each local registrar shall be paid a fee to be established by regulations adopted by the board, for:

each certificate returned by the local registrar to the state registrar in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board; and

each report of no certificate filed during any calendar month. The board may establish a graduated scale for the payment of fees to local registrars, either by limiting the aggregate amount of fees to be paid or by graduating the fees according to the number of registrations.

§ 39-252. Fee for copies, searches and other services — Death certificates.

The state registrar shall be entitled to receive a fee of thirteen dollars ($13.00) for the making of certified copies of records or for a search of the files when no copies are made, provided that the national agency in charge of vital statistics may obtain copies or certifications of data from records without payment of fees, provided that the state incurs no expense in connection therewith. The fee shall be reviewed by the board of health and welfare, and future changes in the fee and enactment of fees for other services shall be established by rules adopted by the board.

For each certified copy of a death certificate there shall be charged an additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) to be deposited in the state treasurer’s local government investment pool, a fund hereby created for the Idaho state association of county coroners. Such moneys shall be used for the training of newly elected coroners and for the continuing education of county coroners and their deputies.

§ 39-253. Accounting for fees.

Fees received from the certifications of such records, from a search of the files or for other services shall be accounted for as prescribed by the state controller.

§ 39-254. Payment of fees to local registration officers.

All amounts payable to local registrars under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid by the respective treasurers of the incorporated city or county in which the registration district is situated out of the general fund of such incorporated city or county, upon certification by the state registrar. The state registrar shall certify to the auditors of the various counties and cities, not less than semiannually, or at such other regular times as may be deemed expedient, the names of the local registrars and the amounts due each at the rates fixed by the board by regulations promulgated pursuant to section 39-251, Idaho Code.

§ 39-255. Registration of births.

A certificate of each birth which occurs in this state shall be filed with the local registrar of the district in which the birth occurs, or as otherwise directed by the state registrar, within fifteen (15) days of the date of birth. No certificate shall be deemed complete until every item of information required shall have been provided or its omission satisfactorily accounted for.

When a birth occurs in an institution or en route thereto, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, secure the signatures required, and file the certificate within fifteen (15) days of the date of birth. The physician or other person in attendance shall provide the medical information required by the certificate and certify to the facts of birth. When the physician, or other person in attendance, is physically unable to certify to the facts of birth within the time prescribed in this section, the person in charge of the institution may complete and sign the certificate.

When a birth occurs outside an institution, the certificate shall be prepared and filed by:

The physician or other person in attendance at or immediately after such birth; or

When no physician or other person is present at or immediately after such birth: the father, or in the event of the death, disability or absence of the father, the mother; or in the event of the death or disability of the mother, the householder or owner of the premises where the birth occurred.

The father, mother or guardian shall verify the facts entered on the certificate by their signature.

When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance within the United States and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state and the place where the child is first removed shall be considered the place of birth. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance while in international air space or in a foreign country or its air space and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state, but the certificate shall show the actual place of birth insofar as can be determined.

If the mother was married at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child, unless:
(e)(1) If the mother was married at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child, unless:

Paternity has been determined otherwise by a court of competent jurisdiction; or

The husband has executed an affidavit of nonpaternity attesting that he is not the father, the mother has executed an acknowledgment of paternity attesting that the alleged father is the father, and the alleged father has executed an acknowledgment of paternity attesting that he is the father. Affidavits may be joint or individual or a combination thereof, and each signature shall be individually notarized. In such event, the alleged father shall be shown as the father on the certificate.

If the mother was not married at the time of either conception or birth, or between conception and birth, the name of the father shall not be entered on the certificate without a notarized voluntary acknowledgment of paternity.

In any case in which paternity of a child is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, the name of the father and surname of the child shall be entered on the certificate of birth in accordance with the finding and order of the court.
(4) If the father is not named on the certificate of birth, no other information about the father shall be entered on the certificate.

§ 39-256. Registration of foundlings.

A foundling certificate shall be filed for each child of unknown parentage within fifteen (15) days of the time the child was found and in the form prescribed by the board. The certificate shall be prepared by the person assuming custody of the child and shall be filed with the local registrar of the district in which the child was found. Such certificate shall be acceptable for all purposes in lieu of a certificate of birth.

§ 39-257. Marriage of natural parents of person born in Idaho — Judicial determination of parentage of person born in Idaho — New birth certificates — Procedure.

When a person born in Idaho has been legitimated by the subsequent marriage of said person’s natural parents and immediately assumes or is assigned a name other than is shown on the recorded birth certificate, the birth certificate of such person may be replaced by a new and conventional certificate (prepared and filed by the state registrar), reflecting the name so assumed or assigned, upon proper application therefor filed by such legitimated person or the parents or one of them, but no one else. Such application shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by a copy of the relevant marriage certificate (if there was one issued and regardless of where it was issued), certified by the issuer or recorder of the same, and, in any event, an affidavit of each of the spouses, factually indicating such parentage, the time and place of the marriage, the identity of the child concerned and the child named in the original birth certificate and giving the assumed or assigned name of the child, which instruments shall be filed of record along with the old birth certificate, but separate from any replacement issued hereunder (which shall be filed separately).

When a person born in Idaho has had said person’s natural parentage finally determined by an Idaho court, the court shall require the preparation of a report of paternity on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report shall include such facts as necessary to complete the amended birth certificate and be certified by the clerk of the court. If a court of some other state issued a decree or report of paternity, the state registrar may prepare and file a new and conventional birth certificate for that person, reflecting the name(s) of the parent(s) and the child’s new name, if applicable, upon application made by that person or either or both of the persons adjudged to be the natural parent(s), or that person’s guardian, but no one else. This application shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the court decree in question and an affidavit of one (1) person factually indicating that the decree involves the same person that the original birth certificate involved. These instruments shall be filed of record along with the old birth certificate, but separate from any replacement issued hereunder (which shall be filed separately).

It shall be the duty of each clerk of court in the state of Idaho to file with the state registrar certified copies of each final decree of paternity determination made by that court within fifteen (15) days after each of such decrees becomes final. Such certified copies of such decrees and all other instruments mentioned in this section, except any replacement certificate, are confidential and shall not be revealed to any person other than the registrant, if of age, the parents or the duly appointed legal representative of any of them, or upon court order issued in the interest of justice.

§ 39-258. Adoption of persons born in Idaho — New birth certificate issued to replace original certificate — Procedure — Adoption proceedings not open to inspection with certain exceptions — Duties of the clerks of courts issuing adoption decrees — Duties of state registrar of vital statistics.

Whenever a final decree of adoption, issued by an Idaho court, declares a person born in Idaho to be adopted by someone other than his or her natural parents, the court shall require the preparation of a report (denominated as a certificate in accordance with Idaho court rules) of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report shall include such facts as are necessary to locate and identify the certificate of birth of the person adopted; shall provide information necessary to establish a new certificate of birth for the person adopted; and shall identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of the court.

Information necessary to prepare the report of adoption shall be furnished by each petitioner for adoption or the petitioner’s attorney. The provision of such information shall be prerequisite to the issuance of a final decree in the matter of the court.

The report of adoption shall, within fifteen (15) days after becoming final, be recorded by the clerk of the court with the vital statistics unit in the state department of health and welfare.

If a court of some other state issued a decree or report of adoption of a person actually born in Idaho, the certified copy or report may be similarly filed by the person involved or by the adoptive parents. Failure to file certified copies or reports of said decrees within said period of time, however, shall not bar issuance of a new birth certificate as hereinafter provided. This copy of said decree or report shall be filed with and remain a part of the records of the vital statistics unit.

Upon receipt by the vital statistics unit of the certified report of adoption, a new certificate of birth shall be issued (but only in cases where such person’s birth is already recorded with the vital statistics unit) bearing among other things the name of the person adopted, as shown in the report of adoption, except that a new certificate of birth shall not be established if so requested by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adopted person. No such birth certificate shall have reference to the adoption of said person. Such birth certificate shall supplant and constitute a replacement of any birth certificate previously issued for said person and shall be the only birth certificate open to public inspection.

Provided however, upon good cause shown and the affidavit of the adoptive parents that a diligent search has been made, but no certificate of birth for the adoptive child can be located, the magistrate judge may order the adoptive child examined, at the expense of the adoptive parents, by a doctor of medicine licensed by the state of Idaho. The examination will be conducted pursuant to rules promulgated by the state board of health and welfare for the purpose of determining those matters required for the issuance of an original birth certificate. Upon the examination of the doctor made pursuant to the rules of the state board of health and welfare, the court may order the vital statistics unit to issue an original birth certificate for the adoptive child based upon those facts determined by the examination and included in the court’s order. In such case a certified copy of the court order shall be provided to the vital statistics unit.
(f) In respect to form and nature of contents, such a new birth certificate shall be identical with a birth certificate issued to natural parents for the birth of a child, except that the adoptive parents shall be shown as parents and the adopted person shall have the name assigned by the decree of adoption as shown on the report of adoption. In a case where a single person adopts another person, any new birth certificate may designate the adopting parent as adoptive.

(g) Whenever an adoption decree is amended, annulled or rescinded, the clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the amendment, annulment or rescindment to the vital statistics unit in accordance with the time provisions in subsection (c) of this section. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the vital statistics unit shall amend the certificate of birth upon receipt of a certified copy of an amended decree of adoption. Upon receipt of a certified copy of a decree of annulment or rescindment of adoption, the original certificate of birth shall be restored to its place in the files and the new certificate and evidence shall not be subject to inspection except upon order of a court of record of this state.

(h) All records and information specified in this section other than a new birth certificate issued hereunder, and all records, files and information of any court in this state relating to adoption proceedings, shall not be open to inspection except as provided in section 39-259A, Idaho Code, or upon the order of a court of record of this state; provided however, that the provisions of section 16-1616, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding, any magistrate judge may furnish a certified copy of a decree of adoption to any duly authorized agency of the United States or the state of Idaho without procuring any prior court order therefor.

§ 39-259. Adoption of persons born in foreign countries.

When it appears from a final decree of adoption issued by an Idaho court that a person born in a foreign country has been adopted in Idaho by someone other than the person’s natural parents, the court shall require the preparation of a report (denominated as a certificate in accordance with Idaho court rules) of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar. The report shall contain evidence from sources determined to be reliable by the court as to the true or probable date and place of birth and parentage of such person; shall provide information necessary to establish a new certificate of birth for the person adopted; and shall identify the order of adoption and be certified by the clerk of the court. Upon receipt by the state registrar of vital statistics of the report of adoption, the state registrar of vital statistics shall make and file a new birth certificate for the child when requested to do so by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adopted person. The new birth certificate shall show the true or probable foreign country (and city, town, village or other local designation, if known) of birth and the true or probable date of birth as established by the court and shown on the court report of adoption, the child’s new name and parentage as stated in the report of adoption, and any other necessary facts as required by the state registrar. This birth certificate shall not be evidence of United States citizenship. The form and content of the certificate of foreign birth shall be established by the director.

All records and information specified in this section other than a new birth certificate issued hereunder, and all records, files and information of any court in this state relating to adoption proceedings, shall not be open to inspection except as provided in section 39-259A, Idaho Code, or upon the order of a court of record of this state; provided however, that the provisions of section 16-1616, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding, any probate court, or the judge thereof, may furnish a certified copy of a decree of adoption to any duly authorized agency of the United States or the state of Idaho without procuring any prior court order therefor.

The report of adoption shall, within fifteen (15) days after becoming final, be recorded by the clerk of the court with the vital statistics unit in the state department of health and welfare.